Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1231
Special education; payment; to whom.

When special education is provided by an educational service unit for children with disabilities as defined in section 79-1118.01, the payments provided by sections 79-1126 to 79-1144 shall be made to such educational service unit.

Laws 1967, c. 517, § 1, p. 1737;

Laws 1986, LB 1177, § 38;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 72;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2213;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 948;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 58.